Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.119

Online learning programs for college credit—Information.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall compile information about online learning programs for high school students to earn college credit and place the information on its website. Examples of information to be compiled and placed on the website include links to purveyors of online learning programs, comparisons among various types of programs regarding costs or awarding of credit, advantages and disadvantages of online learning programs, and other general assistance and guidance for students, teachers, and counselors in selecting and considering online learning programs. The office shall use the expertise of the digital learning commons and WashingtonOnline to provide assistance and suggest resources.

(2) High schools shall ensure that teachers and counselors have information about online learning programs for high school students to earn college credit and are able to assist parents and students in accessing the information. High schools shall ensure that parents and students have opportunities to learn about online learning programs under this section.

(3) For the purposes of this section, online learning programs for high school students to earn college credit include such programs as the running start program under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400, advanced placement courses authorized by the college board, the digital learning commons, University of Washington extension, WashingtonOnline, and other programs and providers that meet qualifications under current laws and rules to offer courses that high schools may accept for credit toward graduation requirements or that offer courses generally accepted for credit by public institutions of higher education in Washington.

[ 2008 c 95 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—2008 c 95: "The legislature finds that student interest and participation in online learning continues to grow. At the same time, the legislature, business community, and public are encouraging additional programs for high school students to earn college credits. Fortunately for students attending schools in rural areas, the two trends can be combined to provide learning opportunities that are both rigorous and accessible, and in some cases available free to the student. In 2006-07, more than four thousand five hundred students were able to take an online college course through the running start program, which the community and technical college system makes accessible statewide through its WashingtonOnline consortium. A more concerted effort is needed to make schools and students aware of these opportunities." [ 2008 c 95 s 1.]